North Carolina statutes. Chapter 15. Criminal Procedure.
Article 13. Venue.

§ 15-128.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1973, c. 1286, s. 26.

Cross References.

See Editor’s note following the analysis to this Chapter. For present provisions as to venue, see

G.S. 15A-131

et seq.

§ 15-129.
In offenses on waters dividing counties.

When any offense is committed on any water, or watercourse whether at high or low water, which water or watercourse, or the sides or shores thereof, divides counties, such offense may be dealt with, inquired of, tried and determined, and punished at the discretion of the court, in either of the two counties which may be nearest to the place where the offense was committed.

History.

R.C., c. 35, s. 24; Code, s. 1193; Rev., s. 3234; C.S., s. 4601; 1973, c. 1286, s. 26; 1975, c. 166, s. 25.

§ 15-130.
Assault in one county, death in another.

In all cases of felonious homicide when the assault has been made in one county within the State, and the person assaulted dies in any other county thereof, the offender shall be indicted and punished for the crime in the county wherein the assault was made.

History.

1831, c. 22, s. 1; R.C., c. 35, s. 27; Code, s. 1196; Rev., s. 3235; C.S., s. 4602.

Cross References.

As to venue, see also

G.S. 15A-131

et seq.

§ 15-131.
Assault in this State, death in another.

In all cases of felonious homicide, when the assault has been made within this State, and the person assaulted dies without the limits thereof, the offender shall be indicted and punished for the crime in the county where the assault was made, in the same manner, to all intents and purposes, as if the person assaulted had died within the limits of this State.

History.

1831, c. 22, s. 2; R.C., c. 35, s. 28; Code, s. 1197; Rev., s. 3236; C.S., s. 4603.

Cross References.

As to venue of offenses occurring in part outside the State, see also

G.S. 15A-134

.

§ 15-132.
Person in this State injuring one in another.

If any person, being in this State, unlawfully and willfully puts in motion a force from the effect of which any person is injured while in another state, the person so setting such force in motion shall be guilty of the same offense in this State as he would be if the effect had taken place within this State.

History.

1895, c. 169; Rev., s. 3237; C.S., s. 4604.

Cross References.

As to venue of offenses occurring in part outside the State, see also

G.S. 15A-134

.

§ 15-133.
In county where death occurs.

If a mortal wound is given or other violence or injury inflicted or poison is administered on the high seas or land, either within or without the limits of this State, by means whereof death ensues in any county thereof, the offense may be prosecuted and punished in the county where the death happens.

History.

1891, c. 68; Rev., s. 3238; C.S., s. 4605.

Cross References.

As to venue of offenses occurring in part outside this state, see also

G.S. 15A-134

.

§§ 15-134 through 15-136.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1973, c. 1286, s. 26.

Cross References.

See Editor’s note following the analysis to this Chapter. For present provisions as to venue, see

G.S. 15A-131

et seq.